California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
Any person or employing unit convicted under this chapter may be charged the costs of investigation and prosecution at the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

2127.

The prosecutor may, with the consent of the department, compromise any penalty for which he or she may bring an action under this chapter. The penalties provided by this chapter are additional to all other penalties provided in this code and Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 30.5.)
-------------------------------------------

2128.

Any employer or agent of an employer who provides a wage statement or similar document to any undocumented worker or former undocumented worker at that person’s request for the purpose of documenting that person’s eligibility for legalization pursuant to the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act (Public Law 99-603), shall not be liable for any penalty or criminal or civil violation under this division relative to any undocumented worker or former undocumented worker based on any facts disclosed in the wage statement or similar document so provided.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability under any provision of law of any person who engages in the procurement or production of false or fraudulent wage statements or similar documents to any person for purposes of legalization under the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act.

This section does not apply to penalties assessed or criminal actions filed prior to May 1, 1987.

This section does not apply where the Employment Development Department, through independent means, discovers that an employer has withheld personal income tax and disability insurance contributions from workers’ paychecks and has not remitted those moneys to the department.

The immunity from liability pursuant to this section shall apply only to facts disclosed in the wage statement or similar document provided commencing on or after the effective date of this section and only until the date of the termination of the legalization provisions for agricultural and nonagricultural workers of the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act. However, the immunity from liability pursuant to this section shall continue until the cause of action is tolled by the applicable statute of limitations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1363, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

2129.

For the purposes of this chapter, “person” includes, a claimant for benefits and any officer, employee, director, partner, or agent having charge of the affairs of any employer or employing unit with regard to the violation which occurred. “Person” also includes both natural persons and legal entities. More than one person may be charged with violations under this chapter, where control of the affairs of the employing unit, or employer, is shared by more than one person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1010, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. DISABILITY COMPENSATION [2601. - 3308.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [2601. - 2615.]

2601.

The purpose of this part is to compensate in part for the wage loss sustained by any individual who is unable to work due to the employee’s own sickness or injury, the sickness or injury of a family member, or the birth, adoption, or foster care placement of a new child, and to reduce to a minimum the suffering caused by unemployment resulting therefrom. This part shall be construed liberally in aid of its declared purpose to mitigate the evils and burdens that fall on the unemployed worker and his or her family.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 901) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 797, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2602.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, the provisions and definitions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of this division apply to this part. In case of any conflict between the provisions of Part 1 and the provisions of this part, the provisions of this part shall prevail with respect to unemployment compensation disability benefits, and the provisions of Part 1 shall prevail with respect to unemployment compensation benefits.

(b) The provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1501) of Part 1, of this division do not apply to this part.

(c) Sections 312, 318, 1251, 1253, 1253.3, 1254, 1255, 1262, 1279, 1326 to 1333, inclusive, 1339, 1340, 1375 to 1378, inclusive, and 1380 do not apply to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 144, Sec. 2.   Effective July 3, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.

Disability benefits paid pursuant to this part shall not be charged against an employer’s account maintained pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 4, Part 1 of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

2604.

Whenever the Director of Employment Development believes that a change in contributions rate or disability benefit amounts may become necessary to protect the solvency of the Disability Fund, he shall at once inform the Governor and the Legislature thereof and make recommendations accordingly. In such case the Governor may declare an emergency and authorize the Director of Employment Development to announce a modified scale of benefits or increased waiting period, or other changes in regulations regarding the eligibility for payment of benefits which the Director of Employment Development may deem necessary to assure the solvency of the Disability Fund; such modified regulations to be in effect until the Governor declares the emergency at an end or until further action is taken by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212, Sec. 209.)
-------------------------------------------

2605.

If at any time the Secretary of Labor or other higher authority rules or determines that any section of this part is not in conformity with the provisions of Title III of the Social Security Act or Section 3302 and Section 3303 of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act by reason of any provision contained in this part, such section shall be immediately inoperative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1184.)
-------------------------------------------

2606.

“Employment” for the purposes of this part means:

(a) Service included in “employment” as defined by Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of this division, except that with respect to service for any public entity as defined by Section 605 “employment” for the purposes of this part includes only:

(1) Service for a hospital established, maintained and operated pursuant to Division 23 (commencing with Section 32000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Service performed for a public housing administration agency whether operated by state or local governmental subdivisions.

(3) Service performed by a state employee to the extent provided by Section 2781.

(4) Service covered under this part by an elective coverage agreement.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, all service performed in the employ of a corporation, community chest, fund, or foundation, in connection with the operation of a health facility as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code including the institutions described in subdivision (a) of Section 1270 of the Health and Safety Code but not including county hospitals, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, no substantial part of the activities of which is carrying on propaganda, or otherwise attempting to influence legislation, which does not participate in, or intervene in (including the publishing or distributing of statements), any political campaign on behalf of any candidate for public office and which is exempt from income tax under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, except service performed by an individual as a duly ordained priest, clergyman, rabbi, rector, vicar, pastor, or minister of religion, or by a practitioner who heals the sick by prayer in the practice of religion, or by a reader whose duty it is to conduct regular religious services of a religious organization, or by a member of a religious order in the exercise of duties required by the order, or by any other individual performing service in the practice of religion by designation of the governing body of a religious organization and subject to discipline by, including removal by, the governing body.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 29, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2606.4.

Notwithstanding Section 632, “employment” for purposes of this part also means service performed as a clerk-carrier in the employ of the United States Postal Service, to the extent Congress permits this part to be applicable to the postal service, and if Congress permits the states to require the postal service to withhold workers’ contributions and to transmit those contributions into a state fund for unemployment compensation disability benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 694.)
-------------------------------------------

2606.5.

(a) “Employment” for purposes of this part also means domestic service in a private home, local college club, or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority performed for an employing unit which pays wages in cash of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) or more to individuals employed in such service during any calendar quarter in the calendar year or the preceding calendar year. 

(b) “Employment” for purposes of this part also means domestic service comprising in-home supportive services under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, performed for an employing unit which pays wages in cash of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) or more to individuals employed in such service during any calendar quarter in the calendar year or preceding calendar year, and is one of the following:

(1) The recipient of such services, if the state or county makes or provides for direct payment to a provider chosen by the recipient or to the recipient of such services for the purchase of services, subject to the provisions of Section 12302.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The individual or entity with which a county contracts to provide in-home supportive services.

(3) Any county which hires and directs in-home supportive personnel in accordance with established county civil service requirements or merit system requirements for those counties not having civil service systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1025, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2608.

(a) “Disability benefit period,” with respect to any individual, means the continuous period of unemployment and disability beginning with the first day with respect to which the individual files a valid claim for unemployment compensation disability benefits. For the purposes of this part, two consecutive periods of disability due to the same or related cause or condition and separated by a period of not more than 60 days shall be considered as one disability benefit period.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 357, Sec. 2.   (SB 667)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2609.

“Valid claim” means any claim for unemployment compensation disability benefits made in accordance with the provisions of this code and rules and regulations adopted thereunder if the individual is unemployed and disabled and has been paid wages in employment for employers necessary to qualify for benefits under Section 2652.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1371.)
-------------------------------------------

2610.

“Disability base period,” with respect to an individual who does not have an unexpired benefit year for unemployment compensation benefits, means for disability benefit periods beginning in October, November, or December, the four calendar quarters ended in the next preceding month of June; the disability base period for disability benefit periods beginning in January, February, or March, shall be the four calendar quarters ended in the next preceding month of September; the disability base period for disability benefit periods beginning in April, May, or June, shall be the four calendar quarters ended in the next preceding month of December; the disability base period for disability benefit periods beginning in July, August, or September shall be the four calendar quarters ended with the next preceding month of March.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 342.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.

“Disability base period,” with respect to an individual who has an unexpired benefit year for unemployment compensation benefits, shall be:

(a) The same as the disability base period in Section 2610 if the individual has sufficient qualifying earnings in that disability base period.

(b) The same as the base period used to establish the benefit year for unemployment compensation benefits if the individual does not have sufficient qualifying earnings in the disability base period in Section 2610.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1143.)
-------------------------------------------

2612.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 2611, in determining the benefit rights of any person who cannot establish a valid claim pursuant to Section 2652 because he or she is unemployed during the normal disability base period established pursuant to Section 2610, there shall be excluded from the disability base period those quarters during which the person performed no services in employment for 60 days or more and was actively seeking work. For all quarters so excluded, there shall be substituted an equal number of quarters immediately preceding the commencement of the normal disability base period. Benefit rights under this section shall terminate for any disability benefit period that begins when the substitution quarters no longer contain sufficient wages to establish a valid claim under Section 2652.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 904, Sec. 1.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

2613.

(a) The Director of Employment Development shall develop and maintain a program of education concerning disability insurance rights and benefits.

(b) The director shall provide to each employer of employees subject to this part a notice informing workers of their disability insurance rights and benefits due to sickness, injury, or pregnancy. The notice shall be given by every employer to each new employee hired on or after June 1, 1988, and to each employee leaving work due to pregnancy or nonoccupational sickness or injury on or after July 1, 1989.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2004, the director shall provide to each employer of employees subject to this part a notice informing workers of their disability insurance rights and benefits due to the employee’s own sickness, injury, or pregnancy, or the employee’s need to provide care for any sick or injured family member, or the employee’s need to bond with a minor child within the first year of the child’s birth or placement in connection with foster care or adoption. The notice shall also instruct the employee to provide notification of the reason for taking leave in a manner consistent with company policy. The notice shall be given by every employer to each new employee hired on or after January 1, 2004, and to each employee leaving work on or after July 1, 2004, due to pregnancy, nonoccupational sickness or injury, or the need to provide care for any sick or injured family member, or the need to bond with a minor child within the first year of the child’s birth or placement in connection with foster care or adoption.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 901) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 797, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2614.

(a) The director shall report to the Assembly Committee on Insurance, Assembly Committee on Labor and Employment, and the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement by June 30 of each year on the department’s fraud deterrence and detection activities.

(b) The department shall assess the effectiveness of the department’s system of cross matching claims against information about incarcerated individuals. The assessment shall include how regularly the department performs the cross matches, how successful the cross matches are in detecting and preventing fraud, and whether the cross matches negatively affect eligible claimants attempting to legally obtain benefits.
 The department shall include this assessment in its annual report on fraud deterrence and detection activities. Details on fraud methods and tools may be generalized, excluded, or redacted to protect the fraud deterrence practices of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 510, Sec. 4.   (AB 56)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2615.

(a) The department, in the administration of this part, shall collect demographic data for individuals who claim disability benefits under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2625) or family temporary disability insurance benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3300), including race and ethnicity data and sexual orientation and gender identity data. The department shall implement the requirements of this section by July 1, 2026.

(b) The department shall collect race and ethnicity data using standardized federal race and ethnicity categories from the federal Office of
 Management and Budget’s “Standards for Maintaining, Collecting, and Presenting Federal Data on Race and Ethnicity.”

(c) (1) The department shall also collect subgroup data for race and ethnicity subgroups that aggregate to the federal Office of Management and Budget categories.

(2) The department shall collect subgroup data for Hispanic or Latino individuals in a manner that is at least as detailed as that required by the 2011 federal standards for health care surveys, entitled “U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Implementation Guidance on Data Collection Standards for Race, Ethnicity,
 Sex, Primary Language, and Disability Status,” allowing individuals to not only self-identify as Hispanic or Latino but to also self-identify as Mexican, Mexican American, Chicano; Puerto Rican; Cuban; or other Hispanic or Latino origin.

(3) Individuals who choose the residual category “other
 Hispanic or Latino origin” shall be given the opportunity to specify the group with which they self-identify.

(4) The department shall collect subgroup data for Asian and Pacific Islander individuals in a manner that provides for data reporting that is at least as detailed as that required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 8310.5 of the Government Code for Asian and Pacific Islander individuals, allowing individuals to not only self-identify as Asian or Pacific Islander but to also self-identify as a member of one of the Asian or Pacific Islander subgroups specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 8310.5 of the Government Code or to choose a residual category of “other Asian” or “other Pacific Islander.”

(5) Individuals who choose the residual categories “other Asian” or “other Pacific Islander” shall be given the opportunity to specify the group with which they self-identify.

(d) The department shall collect sexual orientation and gender identity data in accordance with Section 8310.8 of the Government Code.

(e) The department shall adopt demographic data collection standards, procedures, and processes to implement this section. As the federal Office of Management and Budget’s race and ethnicity categories and standards evolve, the department shall update demographic data collection standards, procedures, and processes in accordance with any new minimum federal Office of Management and Budget race and ethnicity categories or standards, including, but not limited to, those pertaining to Middle Eastern and North African populations and the manner in which race and ethnicity questions are sequenced or combined.

(f) The department shall develop and make available online a public-facing dashboard that publishes disaggregated demographic data pertaining to program participation by individuals and is updated on at least a quarterly basis. The department shall benchmark that information to relevant demographic population estimates to ascertain whether program enrollment by members of the state’s various demographic groups is consistent with, or departs from, their share of the appropriate
 estimated population benchmarks. For race and ethnicity demographic data, such benchmarks shall be determined using population estimates for the federal Office of Management and Budget categories initially specified in subdivision (b) and subsequently specified pursuant to subdivision (e). Wherever available, additional benchmarks shall also be used for population estimates for the subgroup categories specified pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Disability Benefits [2625. - 2778.]



  ARTICLE 1. Eligibility [2625. - 2630.]

2625.

Unemployment compensation disability benefits are payable from the Disability Fund to individuals who are eligible to receive such benefit payments under this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

2626.

(a) An individual shall be deemed disabled on any day in which, because of his or her physical or mental condition, he or she is unable to perform his or her regular or customary work.

(b) For purposes of this section, “disability” or “disabled” includes:

(1) Illness or injury, whether physical or mental, including any illness or injury resulting from pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical condition.

(2) Inability to work because of a written order from a state or local health officer to an individual infected with, or suspected of being infected with, a
 communicable disease.

(3) Acute alcoholism being medically treated or, to the extent specified in Section 2626.1, resident status in an alcoholic recovery home.

(4) Acute drug-induced illness being medically treated or, to the extent specified in Section 2626.2, resident status in a drug-free residential facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 392, Sec. 5.   (AB 2538)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2626.1.

(a) An individual who is a resident in an alcoholic recovery home pursuant to referral or recommendation by a physician shall be eligible for disability benefits for a period not in excess of 30 days in any disability benefit period while receiving resident services, if an authorized representative of the alcoholic recovery home certifies that the individual is a resident participating in an alcoholic recovery program which has been certified by the State Department of Health Care Services. The individual shall be eligible for disability benefits for an additional period not in excess of 60 days if the referring physician certifies to the need of the individual for continuing resident services.

(b) The department shall reimburse the State Department of Health Care Services from the Disability Fund, in a reasonable amount as determined by the department, for the expense of reviewing any alcoholic recovery program, as required by the department in the administration of subdivision (a) which is not funded in the county alcohol program plan provided for in Article 3 (commencing with Section 11810) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 11830) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Outside the State of California, an individual who is a resident in an alcohol recovery home pursuant to referral or recommendation by a physician shall be eligible for disability benefits for a period not in excess of 30 days in any disability benefit period while receiving resident services, if an authorized representative of the alcoholic recovery home certifies that the individual is a resident participating in an alcoholic
 recovery program, licensed by or satisfying a program review by the state in which the facility is located. The individual shall be eligible for disability benefits for an additional period not in excess of 60 days if the referring physician certifies to the need of the individual for continuing resident services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 84.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

2626.2.

(a) An individual who is a resident in a drug-free residential facility pursuant to referral or recommendation by a physician shall be eligible for disability benefits for a period not in excess of 45 days in any disability benefit period while receiving resident services, if an authorized representative of the drug-free residential facility certifies that the individual is a resident participating in a drug-free residential facility which has satisfied a program review by the State Department of Health Care Services. The individual shall be eligible for disability benefits for an additional period not in excess of 45 days if the referring physician certifies to the need of the individual for continuing resident services.

(b) The department shall reimburse the State Department of Health Care Services from the Disability Fund, in a reasonable amount as determined by the department, for the expense of reviewing any drug-free residential facility, as required by the department in the administration of subdivision (a), which is not funded under the federal Drug Abuse Office and Treatment Act of 1972 (Public Law 92-255) or in conformance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 11975) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Outside the State of California, an individual who is a resident in a drug-free residential facility pursuant to referral or recommendation by a physician shall be eligible for disability benefits for a period not in excess of 45 days in any disability benefit period while receiving resident services, if an authorized representative of the drug-free
 residential facility certifies that the individual is a resident participating in a drug-free residential program, licensed by or satisfying a program review by the state in which the facility is located. The individual shall be eligible for disability benefits for an additional period, but not in excess of 45 days, if the referring physician certifies to the need of the individual for continuing resident services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 85.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

2627.

A disabled individual is eligible to receive disability benefits equal to one-seventh of his or her weekly benefit amount for each full day during which he or she is unemployed due to a disability only if the director finds that:

(a) He or she has made a claim for disability benefits as required by authorized regulations.

(b) (1) He or she has been unemployed and disabled for a waiting period of seven consecutive days during each disability benefit period with respect to which waiting period no disability benefits are payable.

(2) The waiting period requirement shall not apply to a person who has met the waiting period
 requirements on the initial claim for disability benefits when that person files a subsequent claim for disability benefits for the same or a related cause or condition within 60 days after the original disability benefit period.

(c) Except as provided in Sections 2626.1, 2626.2, and 2709, he or she has submitted to such reasonable examinations as the director may require for the purpose of determining his or her disability.

(d) Except as provided in Section 2708.1, he or she has filed a certificate as required by Section 2708 or 2709.

(e) The director shall report to the Legislature regarding the effect of the modified waiting period in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) on or before January 1, 2020, and may submit subsequent reports thereafter. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the
 Government Code.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 357, Sec. 4.   (SB 667)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2628.

An individual is not eligible for disability benefits with respect to any period for which the director finds that he has received or is entitled to receive unemployment compensation benefits under Part 1 of this division or under an unemployment compensation act of any other state or of the Federal Government.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

2629.

(a) Except as provided in this section, an individual is not eligible for disability benefits under this part for any day of unemployment and disability for which he or she has received, or is entitled to receive, “other benefits” in the form of cash payments.

(b) “Other benefits,” as used in this section and Section 2629.1, means any of the following:

(1) Temporary disability indemnity under a workers’ compensation law of this state or of any other state or of the federal government.

(2) Temporary disability benefits under any employer’s liability law of
 this state or of any other state or of the federal government.

(3) Permanent disability benefits for the same injury or illness under the workers’ compensation law of this state, any other state, or the federal government.

(c) If these “other benefits” are less than the amount an individual would otherwise receive as disability benefits under this part, he or she shall be entitled to receive, for that day, if otherwise eligible, disability benefits under this part reduced by the amount of these “other benefits.”

(d) An individual shall be entitled to receive, for any day, if otherwise eligible, disability benefits under this part reduced by the amount of the permanent disability indemnity if the permanent disability indemnity is less than the amount an individual would otherwise receive as disability benefits under
 this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 392, Sec. 6.   (AB 2538)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2629.1.

(a) Nothing in Section 2629 shall be construed to authorize the delay of payment of unemployment compensation disability benefits except where the claimant is currently in receipt of other benefits or where the department has received notice that the claimant’s employer or insurer has agreed to commence the payment of other benefits.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 2701.5, payments shall commence within 14 days after notice to the employer or insurer under this section unless the employer or insurer has either paid or has agreed to commence the payment of other benefits.

(c) Upon the filing of a claim for unemployment compensation disability benefits, the department shall make an initial determination as to the claimant’s entitlement to other benefits for purposes of Section 2629.

(1) The department shall notify the claimant and the claimant’s employer if it determines that the claimant is entitled to other benefits.

(2) The notice to the claimant shall inform the claimant that disability benefits will be paid pending receipt of other benefits if the employer fails to agree to pay these other benefits within 14 days of notification of industrial injury and shall advise the claimant of the provisions of Section 2629.

(3) The department shall also include with the claimant’s notice a pamphlet to be provided by the Department of Industrial Relations which meets the criteria specified in subdivision (b) of Section 139.6 of the Labor Code.

(4) The notice to the employer shall constitute a claim for compensation and knowledge of an injury for purposes of Section 5402 of the Labor Code, and shall inform the employer of its potential liability for interest and penalties under this section.

(d) If the employer or the insurance carrier disputes liability for the payment of other benefits, or the extent thereof, the department’s right to reimbursement shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board in accordance with Part 4 (commencing with Section 5300) of Division 4 of the Labor Code.

(e) An employer or insurance carrier who subsequently assumes liability or is determined to be liable for reimbursement to the department for unemployment compensation disability benefits which the department has paid in lieu of other benefits shall be assessed for this liability by the department. In addition, the employer shall pay the department interest on the disability benefits at the annual rate provided in Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The employer shall also pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount reimbursed to the department if the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board finds that the failure of the employer to pay other benefits upon notice by the department under this section was unreasonable and a penalty has not been awarded for the delay under Section 5814 of the Labor Code. All funds received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Disability Fund.

(f) The employer shall reimburse the department in accordance with subdivision (e) within 60 days of either voluntarily accepting liability for other benefits or after a final award, order, or decision of the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 95.   Effective October 6, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 102 of Ch. 877.)
-------------------------------------------

2629.5.

To the extent permitted by federal law, excludable restitution payments, as defined in Section 17131.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and excludable settlement payments, as defined in Section 17131.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, may not be applied to reduce the amount of disability benefits to which an individual may otherwise be entitled under law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 402, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2630.

(a) The Department of Child Support Services shall periodically notify the department of individuals who are certified, as provided in Section 17518 of the Family Code, as having support obligations, as defined by subdivision (g) and notify the department of any changes in the status of these individuals to ensure that the department has a current record.

(b) Upon receipt of the notifications referred to in subdivision (a), the department shall determine whether the individuals have claims for unemployment compensation disability benefits, either with the department or under an approved voluntary plan.

(c) If the department determines that an individual referred to in subdivision (a) has a claim for unemployment compensation disability benefits with an approved voluntary plan, it shall notify the voluntary plan payer. When the Department of Child Support Services notifies the department of any changes in the individual’s status as to his or her support obligations, the department shall in turn notify the voluntary plan payer. Upon notification from the department, the voluntary plan payer shall deduct and withhold the amounts specified in Section 17518 of the Family Code from the unemployment compensation disability benefits that would otherwise be payable to the individual. For each withholding, the voluntary plan payer shall deduct an amount which represents the amount withheld for support obligations and may also deduct an administrative fee representing actual costs, not to exceed two dollars ($2). In no event shall the withholding and the administrative fee exceed 25 percent or a lesser amount as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 17518 of the Family Code. The voluntary plan payer shall pay the amounts for support deducted and withheld pursuant to this section to the appropriate certifying county.

(d) The department shall maintain a current record of individuals certified as owing support obligations. If the department determines that the individual has a claim for unemployment compensation disability benefits with the department, it shall deduct and withhold the amounts specified in Section 17518 of the Family Code from the unemployment compensation disability benefits that would otherwise be payable to the individual. The department shall periodically pay the amounts deducted and withheld to the appropriate county or to the Department of Child Support Services as the assigned payee, as stipulated by mutual agreement, in the interagency agreement between the department and the Department of Child Support Services.

(e) Amounts deducted and withheld from an individual’s unemployment compensation disability benefits in accordance with subdivision (c) or (d) shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual and then paid by the individual to the Department of Child Support Services or the appropriate certifying county.

(f) This section shall apply only if appropriate arrangements are made for the Department of Child Support Services to reimburse the department for its administrative costs for performing the functions required of it by this section.

(g) For purposes of this section, “support obligations” means the child and related spousal support obligations described in the state plan approved pursuant to Section 454 of the Social Security Act and as that section may hereafter be amended. However, to the extent “related spousal support obligations” may not be collected from unemployment compensation under federal law, those obligations shall not be included in the definition of support obligations under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 117.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Computation (Amount and Duration) [2652. - 2658.]

2652.

An individual cannot establish a valid claim unless he has during his disability base period been paid wages for employment by employers of not less than three hundred dollars ($300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2107.)
-------------------------------------------

2653.

Except as provided in Sections 708 and 708.5, the maximum amount of benefits payable to an individual during any one disability benefit period shall be 52 times his or her weekly benefit amount, but in no case shall the total amount of the benefits payable be more than the total wages paid to the individual during his or her disability base period. If the benefit is not a multiple of one dollar ($1) it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

This section shall apply to periods of disability
 commencing on or after January 1, 1984.
